Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,124.02
Access to property.

If necessary in the course of an investigation or inspection or during the remedial action and if the owner of property or the owner's agent has specifically denied the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment access to the property for such purposes, the department may order the owner or owner's agent to grant access to property for the performance of reasonable steps, including drilling, to determine the source and extent of contamination or for remediation. Access shall be by the department or by a person conducting an investigation, inspection, or remedial action at the direction of the department. All actions taken on the property shall be performed in the least obtrusive manner possible to allow the investigation, inspection, or remedial action to proceed. Upon completion of any such actions, the property shall be restored as nearly as possible to its original condition.

Laws 1991, LB 409, § 21;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 62;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 121;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 22.
July 18, 2026